Utah statutes.
17B-1-627.   Property tax levy -- Time for setting -- Computation of total
levy -- Apportionment of proceeds -- Maximum levy.
(1)  The board of trustees of each local district authorized to levy a
property tax, at a regular meeting or special meeting called for that purpose,
shall, by resolution, set the real and personal property tax rate for various
district purposes by the date set under Section 59-2-912, but the rate may be
set at an appropriate later date in accordance with Sections 59-2-919 through
59-2-923.
(2)  In its computation of the total levy, the board of trustees shall
determine the requirements of each fund for which property taxes are to be
levied and shall specify in its resolution adopting the tax rate the amount
apportioned to each fund.
(3)  The proceeds of the levy apportioned for general fund purposes shall be
credited as revenue in the general fund.
(4)  The proceeds of the levy apportioned for special fund purposes shall be
credited to the appropriate accounts in the applicable special funds.
(5)  The combined levies for each district for all purposes in any year,
excluding the retirement of general obligation bonds and the payment of any
interest on the bonds, and any taxes expressly authorized by law to be levied
in addition, may not exceed the limit enumerated by the laws governing each
district.
